Utah statutes.
9-6-602.   Office of Museum Services created -- Purpose.

(1)  There is created within the Division of Arts and Museums the Office of Museum Services.

(2)  The office shall assist Utah museums in improving their ability to:

(a)  care for and manage collections;

(b)  develop quality educational resources such as exhibitions, collections, and publications; and

(c)  provide access to collections for research.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 24, 2006 General Session

